Lang_Hungarian/resources/hunmorph/ocamorph/test/hu_HU.aff
SFX C Y 5
SFX C 0 öttünk . <PAST><PERS<1>><PLUR>>  
SFX C 0 öttem . <PAST><PERS<1>>>  
SFX C 0 öttetek . <PAST><PERS<2>><PLUR>>  
SFX C 0 öttél . <PAST><PERS<2>>>  
SFX C 0 öttek . <PAST><PLUR>>  

SFX J Y 1
SFX J 0 ötök . <PERS<2>><PLUR>>  

SFX M Y 142
SFX M 0 jél [^sztj] <SUBJUNC-IMP><PERS<2>>>long form  
SFX M 0 jjem [aáeéiíoóöõuúüû] <SUBJUNC-IMP><PERS<1>><DEF>>  
SFX M 0 jem [aáeéiíoóöõuúüû] <SUBJUNC-IMP><PERS<1>><DEF>>  
SFX M 0 sem [bcdfghjklmnpqrtvwxyû]t <SUBJUNC-IMP><PERS<1>><DEF>>  
SFX M t ssem [aeioöuü]t <SUBJUNC-IMP><PERS<1>><DEF>>  
SFX M z dzem dz <SUBJUNC-IMP><PERS<1>><DEF>>  
SFX M zt szem szt <SUBJUNC-IMP><PERS<1>><DEF>>  
SFX M 0 sem s <SUBJUNC-IMP><PERS<1>><DEF>>  
SFX M 0 jek j <SUBJUNC-IMP><PERS<1>>>  
SFX M 0 sek s <SUBJUNC-IMP><PERS<1>>>  
SFX M 0 jek [^sztj] <SUBJUNC-IMP><PERS<1>>>  
SFX M 0 zenek [^sd]z <SUBJUNC-IMP><PLUR>>  
SFX M 0 jön j <SUBJUNC-IMP>>  
SFX M 0 sön s <SUBJUNC-IMP>>  
SFX M 0 jük [^aáeéiíoóöõuúüûszt] <SUBJUNC-IMP><PERS<1>><PLUR><DEF>>  
SFX M 0 jön [^sztj] <SUBJUNC-IMP>>  
SFX M 0 jjed [aáeéiíoóöõuúüû] <SUBJUNC-IMP><PERS<2>><DEF>>long form  
SFX M 0 jed [aáeéiíoóöõuúüû] <SUBJUNC-IMP><PERS<2>><DEF>>long form  
SFX M 0 sed [bcdfghjklmnpqrtvwxyû]t <SUBJUNC-IMP><PERS<2>><DEF>>long form  
SFX M t ssed [aeioöuü]t <SUBJUNC-IMP><PERS<2>><DEF>>long form  
SFX M z dzed dz <SUBJUNC-IMP><PERS<2>><DEF>>long form  
SFX M zt szed szt <SUBJUNC-IMP><PERS<2>><DEF>>long form  
SFX M 0 sed s <SUBJUNC-IMP><PERS<2>><DEF>>long form  
SFX M 0 ze [^sd]z <SUBJUNC-IMP><DEF>>  
SFX M 0 zétek [^sd]z <SUBJUNC-IMP><PERS<2>><PLUR><DEF>>  
SFX M 0 zek [^sd]z <SUBJUNC-IMP><PERS<1>>>  
SFX M 0 jjetek [aáeéiíoóöõuúüû] <SUBJUNC-IMP><PERS<2>><PLUR>>  
SFX M 0 setek [bcdfghjklmnpqrtvwxyû]t <SUBJUNC-IMP><PERS<2>><PLUR>>  
SFX M t ssetek [aeioöuü]t <SUBJUNC-IMP><PERS<2>><PLUR>>  
SFX M z dzetek dz <SUBJUNC-IMP><PERS<2>><PLUR>>  
SFX M zt szetek szt <SUBJUNC-IMP><PERS<2>><PLUR>>  
SFX M 0 jjenek [aáeéiíoóöõuúüû] <SUBJUNC-IMP><PLUR>>  
SFX M 0 senek [bcdfghjklmnpqrtvwxyû]t <SUBJUNC-IMP><PLUR>>  
SFX M t ssenek [aeioöuü]t <SUBJUNC-IMP><PLUR>>  
SFX M z dzenek dz <SUBJUNC-IMP><PLUR>>  
SFX M zt szenek szt <SUBJUNC-IMP><PLUR>>  
SFX M 0 jenek j <SUBJUNC-IMP><PLUR>>  
SFX M 0 senek s <SUBJUNC-IMP><PLUR>>  
SFX M 0 je [^aáeéiíoóöõuúüûszt] <SUBJUNC-IMP><DEF>>  
SFX M 0 zön [^sd]z <SUBJUNC-IMP>>  
SFX M 0 dd [aáeéiíoóöõuúüû] <SUBJUNC-IMP><PERS<2>><DEF>>  
SFX M t sd [aeioöuü]t <SUBJUNC-IMP><PERS<2>><DEF>>  
SFX M z zd dz <SUBJUNC-IMP><PERS<2>><DEF>>  
SFX M zt zd szt <SUBJUNC-IMP><PERS<2>><DEF>>  
SFX M 0 d s <SUBJUNC-IMP><PERS<2>><DEF>>  
SFX M 0 jék [^sztj] <SUBJUNC-IMP>>formal  
SFX M 0 jjek [aáeéiíoóöõuúüû] <SUBJUNC-IMP><PERS<1>>>  
SFX M 0 jék j <SUBJUNC-IMP>>formal  
SFX M 0 sék s <SUBJUNC-IMP>>formal  
SFX M 0 sek [bcdfghjklmnpqrtvwxyû]t <SUBJUNC-IMP><PERS<1>>>  
SFX M t ssek [aeioöuü]t <SUBJUNC-IMP><PERS<1>>>  
SFX M z dzek dz <SUBJUNC-IMP><PERS<1>>>  
SFX M zt szek szt <SUBJUNC-IMP><PERS<1>>>  
SFX M 0 sék s <SUBJUNC-IMP><PLUR><DEF>>  
SFX M 0 jjön [aáeéiíoóöõuúüû] <SUBJUNC-IMP>>  
SFX M 0 sön [bcdfghjklmnpqrtvwxyû]t <SUBJUNC-IMP>>  
SFX M t ssön [aeioöuü]t <SUBJUNC-IMP>>  
SFX M z dzön dz <SUBJUNC-IMP>>  
SFX M zt szön szt <SUBJUNC-IMP>>  
SFX M 0 zék [^sd]z <SUBJUNC-IMP>>formal  
SFX M 0 jél j <SUBJUNC-IMP><PERS<2>>>long form  
SFX M 0 sél s <SUBJUNC-IMP><PERS<2>>>long form  
SFX M 0 zed [^sd]z <SUBJUNC-IMP><PERS<2>><DEF>>long form  
SFX M 0 jétek [^aáeéiíoóöõuúüûszt] <SUBJUNC-IMP><PERS<2>><PLUR><DEF>>  
SFX M 0 zünk [^sd]z <SUBJUNC-IMP><PERS<1>><PLUR>>  
SFX M 0 zem [^sd]z <SUBJUNC-IMP><PERS<1>><DEF>>  
SFX M 0 jed [^aáeéiíoóöõuúüûszt] <SUBJUNC-IMP><PERS<2>><DEF>>long form  
SFX M 0 jj [aáeéiíoóöõuúüû] <SUBJUNC-IMP><PERS<2>>>short form  
SFX M 0 s [bcdfghjklmnpqrtvwxyû]t <SUBJUNC-IMP><PERS<2>>>short form  
SFX M t ss [aeioöuü]t <SUBJUNC-IMP><PERS<2>>>short form  
SFX M z dz dz <SUBJUNC-IMP><PERS<2>>>short form  
SFX M zt sz szt <SUBJUNC-IMP><PERS<2>>>short form  
SFX M 0 jjünk [aáeéiíoóöõuúüû] <SUBJUNC-IMP><PERS<1>><PLUR>>  
SFX M 0 j j <SUBJUNC-IMP><PERS<2>>>short form  
SFX M 0 sünk [bcdfghjklmnpqrtvwxyû]t <SUBJUNC-IMP><PERS<1>><PLUR>>  
SFX M t ssünk [aeioöuü]t <SUBJUNC-IMP><PERS<1>><PLUR>>  
SFX M z dzünk dz <SUBJUNC-IMP><PERS<1>><PLUR>>  
SFX M zt szünk szt <SUBJUNC-IMP><PERS<1>><PLUR>>  
SFX M 0 s s <SUBJUNC-IMP><PERS<2>>>short form  
SFX M 0 jünk j <SUBJUNC-IMP><PERS<1>><PLUR>>  
SFX M 0 sünk s <SUBJUNC-IMP><PERS<1>><PLUR>>  
SFX M 0 jem [^aáeéiíoóöõuúüûszt] <SUBJUNC-IMP><PERS<1>><DEF>>  
SFX M 0 jjék [aáeéiíoóöõuúüû] <SUBJUNC-IMP>>formal  
SFX M 0 sék [bcdfghjklmnpqrtvwxyû]t <SUBJUNC-IMP>>formal  
SFX M t ssék [aeioöuü]t <SUBJUNC-IMP>>formal  
SFX M z dzék dz <SUBJUNC-IMP>>formal  
SFX M zt szék szt <SUBJUNC-IMP>>formal  
SFX M 0 jetek [^sztj] <SUBJUNC-IMP><PERS<2>><PLUR>>  
SFX M 0 jjék [aáeéiíoóöõuúüû] <SUBJUNC-IMP><PLUR><DEF>>  
SFX M 0 jék [aáeéiíoóöõuúüû] <SUBJUNC-IMP><PLUR><DEF>>  
SFX M 0 sék [bcdfghjklmnpqrtvwxyû]t <SUBJUNC-IMP><PLUR><DEF>>  
SFX M t ssék [aeioöuü]t <SUBJUNC-IMP><PLUR><DEF>>  
SFX M z dzék dz <SUBJUNC-IMP><PLUR><DEF>>  
SFX M zt szék szt <SUBJUNC-IMP><PLUR><DEF>>  
SFX M 0 zük [^sd]z <SUBJUNC-IMP><PERS<1>><PLUR><DEF>>  
SFX M 0 zék [^sd]z <SUBJUNC-IMP><PLUR><DEF>>  
SFX M 0 jje [aáeéiíoóöõuúüû] <SUBJUNC-IMP><DEF>>  
SFX M 0 je [aáeéiíoóöõuúüû] <SUBJUNC-IMP><DEF>>  
SFX M 0 se [bcdfghjklmnpqrtvwxyû]t <SUBJUNC-IMP><DEF>>  
SFX M t sse [aeioöuü]t <SUBJUNC-IMP><DEF>>  
SFX M z dze dz <SUBJUNC-IMP><DEF>>  
SFX M zt sze szt <SUBJUNC-IMP><DEF>>  
SFX M 0 se s <SUBJUNC-IMP><DEF>>  
SFX M 0 jünk [^sztj] <SUBJUNC-IMP><PERS<1>><PLUR>>  
SFX M 0 d [^sd]z <SUBJUNC-IMP><PERS<2>><DEF>>  
SFX M 0 zelek [^sd]z <SUBJUNC-IMP><PERS<1<OBJ<2>>>>>  
SFX M 0 j [^sztj] <SUBJUNC-IMP><PERS<2>>>short form  
SFX M 0 jék [^aáeéiíoóöõuúüûszt] <SUBJUNC-IMP><PLUR><DEF>>  
SFX M 0 zetek [^sd]z <SUBJUNC-IMP><PERS<2>><PLUR>>  
SFX M 0 d [^aáeéiíoóöõuúüûszt] <SUBJUNC-IMP><PERS<2>><DEF>>  
SFX M 0 jjél [aáeéiíoóöõuúüû] <SUBJUNC-IMP><PERS<2>>>long form  
SFX M 0 zél [^sd]z <SUBJUNC-IMP><PERS<2>>>long form  
SFX M 0 jelek [^aáeéiíoóöõuúüûszt] <SUBJUNC-IMP><PERS<1<OBJ<2>>>>>  
SFX M 0 sél [bcdfghjklmnpqrtvwxyû]t <SUBJUNC-IMP><PERS<2>>>long form  
SFX M t ssél [aeioöuü]t <SUBJUNC-IMP><PERS<2>>>long form  
SFX M z dzél dz <SUBJUNC-IMP><PERS<2>>>long form  
SFX M zt szél szt <SUBJUNC-IMP><PERS<2>>>long form  
SFX M 0 jjük [aáeéiíoóöõuúüû] <SUBJUNC-IMP><PERS<1>><PLUR><DEF>>  
SFX M 0 jük [aáeéiíoóöõuúüû] <SUBJUNC-IMP><PERS<1>><PLUR><DEF>>  
SFX M 0 sük [bcdfghjklmnpqrtvwxyû]t <SUBJUNC-IMP><PERS<1>><PLUR><DEF>>  
SFX M t ssük [aeioöuü]t <SUBJUNC-IMP><PERS<1>><PLUR><DEF>>  
SFX M z dzük dz <SUBJUNC-IMP><PERS<1>><PLUR><DEF>>  
SFX M zt szük szt <SUBJUNC-IMP><PERS<1>><PLUR><DEF>>  
SFX M 0 sük s <SUBJUNC-IMP><PERS<1>><PLUR><DEF>>  
SFX M 0 jetek j <SUBJUNC-IMP><PERS<2>><PLUR>>  
SFX M 0 setek s <SUBJUNC-IMP><PERS<2>><PLUR>>  
SFX M 0 jjelek [aáeéiíoóöõuúüû] <SUBJUNC-IMP><PERS<1<OBJ<2>>>>>  
SFX M 0 jelek [aáeéiíoóöõuúüû] <SUBJUNC-IMP><PERS<1<OBJ<2>>>>>  
SFX M 0 selek [bcdfghjklmnpqrtvwxyû]t <SUBJUNC-IMP><PERS<1<OBJ<2>>>>>  
SFX M t sselek [aeioöuü]t <SUBJUNC-IMP><PERS<1<OBJ<2>>>>>  
SFX M z dzelek dz <SUBJUNC-IMP><PERS<1<OBJ<2>>>>>  
SFX M zt szelek szt <SUBJUNC-IMP><PERS<1<OBJ<2>>>>>  
SFX M 0 jjétek [aáeéiíoóöõuúüû] <SUBJUNC-IMP><PERS<2>><PLUR><DEF>>  
SFX M 0 jétek [aáeéiíoóöõuúüû] <SUBJUNC-IMP><PERS<2>><PLUR><DEF>>  
SFX M 0 sétek [bcdfghjklmnpqrtvwxyû]t <SUBJUNC-IMP><PERS<2>><PLUR><DEF>>  
SFX M t ssétek [aeioöuü]t <SUBJUNC-IMP><PERS<2>><PLUR><DEF>>  
SFX M z dzétek dz <SUBJUNC-IMP><PERS<2>><PLUR><DEF>>  
SFX M zt szétek szt <SUBJUNC-IMP><PERS<2>><PLUR><DEF>>  
SFX M 0 selek s <SUBJUNC-IMP><PERS<1<OBJ<2>>>>>  
SFX M 0 sétek s <SUBJUNC-IMP><PERS<2>><PLUR><DEF>>  
SFX M 0 z [^sd]z <SUBJUNC-IMP><PERS<2>>>short form  
SFX M 0 jenek [^sztj] <SUBJUNC-IMP><PLUR>>  

SFX G Y 2
SFX G 0 öd . <PERS<2>><DEF>>  
SFX G 0 öm . <PERS<1>><DEF>>  

SFX z Y 7
SFX z 0 telek . <PAST><PERS<1<OBJ<2>>>>>  
SFX z 0 tétek . <PAST><PERS<2>><PLUR><DEF>>  
SFX z 0 tem . <PAST><PERS<1>><DEF>>  
SFX z 0 ted . <PAST><PERS<2>><DEF>>  
SFX z 0 te . <PAST><DEF>>  
SFX z 0 ték . <PAST><PLUR><DEF>>  
SFX z 0 tük . <PAST><PERS<1>><PLUR><DEF>>  

SFX w Y 7
SFX w 0 tad . <PAST><PERS<2>><DEF>>  
SFX w 0 tuk . <PAST><PERS<1>><PLUR><DEF>>  
SFX w 0 tátok . <PAST><PERS<2>><PLUR><DEF>>  
SFX w 0 ta . <PAST><DEF>>  
SFX w 0 ták . <PAST><PLUR><DEF>>  
SFX w 0 tam . <PAST><PERS<1>><DEF>>  
SFX w 0 talak . <PAST><PERS<1<OBJ<2>>>>>  

SFX o Y 10
SFX o 0 nók . <COND><PERS<1>><PLUR><DEF>>formal  
SFX o 0 nátok . <COND><PERS<2>><PLUR><DEF>>  
SFX o 0 nám . <COND><PERS<1>><DEF>>  
SFX o 0 nánk . <COND><PERS<1>><PLUR><DEF>>  
SFX o 0 lak [^l]. <PERS<1<OBJ<2>>>>>  
SFX o 0 nád . <COND><PERS<2>><DEF>>  
SFX o 0 nálak . <COND><PERS<1<OBJ<2>>>>>  
SFX o 0 nák . <COND><PLUR><DEF>>  
SFX o 0 ná . <COND><DEF>>  
SFX o 0 lak l[^l] <PERS<1<OBJ<2>>>>>  

SFX j Y 1
SFX j 0 ok . <PERS<1>>>  

SFX g Y 8
SFX g 0 tok . <PERS<2>><PLUR>>  
SFX g 0 nak . <PLUR>>  
SFX g 0 nátok . <COND><PERS<2>><PLUR>>  
SFX g 0 nák . <COND><PERS<1>>>  
SFX g 0 nál . <COND><PERS<2>>>  
SFX g 0 na . <COND>>  
SFX g 0 nánk . <COND><PERS<1>><PLUR>>  
SFX g 0 nának . <COND><PLUR>>  

SFX k Y 5
SFX k 0 tunk . <PAST><PERS<1>><PLUR>>  
SFX k 0 tak . <PAST><PLUR>>  
SFX k 0 tatok . <PAST><PERS<2>><PLUR>>  
SFX k 0 tam . <PAST><PERS<1>>>  
SFX k 0 tál . <PAST><PERS<2>>>  

SFX f Y 1
SFX f 0 ök . <PERS<1>>>  

SFX H Y 1
SFX H 0 tök . <PERS<2>><PLUR>>  

SFX l Y 3
SFX l 0 öl [sz] <PERS<2>>>  
SFX l 0 öm . <PERS<1>>>  
SFX l 0 ök . <PERS<1>>>informal  

SFX d Y 5
SFX d 0 tem . <PAST><PERS<1>>>  
SFX d 0 tetek . <PAST><PERS<2>><PLUR>>  
SFX d 0 tél . <PAST><PERS<2>>>  
SFX d 0 tünk . <PAST><PERS<1>><PLUR>>  
SFX d 0 tek . <PAST><PLUR>>  

SFX c Y 9
SFX c 0 ttatok [aáeéiíoóöõuúüû] <PAST><PERS<2>><PLUR>>  
SFX c 0 ttál [aáeéiíoóöõuúüû] <PAST><PERS<2>>>  
SFX c 0 ol [sz] <PERS<2>>>  
SFX c 0 unk . <PERS<1>><PLUR>>  
SFX c 0 ok . <PERS<1>>>informal  
SFX c 0 ttunk [aáeéiíoóöõuúüû] <PAST><PERS<1>><PLUR>>  
SFX c 0 ttam [aáeéiíoóöõuúüû] <PAST><PERS<1>>>  
SFX c 0 ttak [aáeéiíoóöõuúüû] <PAST><PLUR>>  
SFX c 0 om . <PERS<1>>>  

SFX q Y 5
SFX q 0 ottunk . <PAST><PERS<1>><PLUR>>  
SFX q 0 ottam . <PAST><PERS<1>>>  
SFX q 0 ottál . <PAST><PERS<2>>>  
SFX q 0 ottak . <PAST><PLUR>>  
SFX q 0 ottatok . <PAST><PERS<2>><PLUR>>  

SFX O Y 10
SFX O 0 ana . <COND>>  
SFX O 0 anának . <COND><PLUR>>  
SFX O 0 anék . <COND><PERS<1>>>  
SFX O 0 anánk . <COND><PERS<1>><PLUR>>  
SFX O 0 anak . <PLUR>>  
SFX O 0 anák . <COND><PERS<1>>>  
SFX O 0 otok . <PERS<2>><PLUR>>  
SFX O 0 anátok . <COND><PERS<2>><PLUR>>  
SFX O 0 anál . <COND><PERS<2>>>  
SFX O 0 asz [^sz] <PERS<2>>>  

SFX i Y 9
SFX i 0 od . <PERS<2>><DEF>>  
SFX i 0 ttátok [aáeéiíoóöõuúüû] <PAST><PERS<2>><PLUR><DEF>>  
SFX i 0 ttad [aáeéiíoóöõuúüû] <PAST><PERS<2>><DEF>>  
SFX i 0 ttam [aáeéiíoóöõuúüû] <PAST><PERS<1>><DEF>>  
SFX i 0 ttalak [aáeéiíoóöõuúüû] <PAST><PERS<1<OBJ<2>>>>>  
SFX i 0 om . <PERS<1>><DEF>>  
SFX i 0 ttuk [aáeéiíoóöõuúüû] <PAST><PERS<1>><PLUR><DEF>>  
SFX i 0 tták [aáeéiíoóöõuúüû] <PAST><PLUR><DEF>>  
SFX i 0 tta [aáeéiíoóöõuúüû] <PAST><DEF>>  

SFX p Y 7
SFX p 0 otta . <PAST><DEF>>  
SFX p 0 ottuk . <PAST><PERS<1>><PLUR><DEF>>  
SFX p 0 ottam . <PAST><PERS<1>><DEF>>  
SFX p 0 ottad . <PAST><PERS<2>><DEF>>  
SFX p 0 ották . <PAST><PLUR><DEF>>  
SFX p 0 ottalak . <PAST><PERS<1<OBJ<2>>>>>  
SFX p 0 ottátok . <PAST><PERS<2>><PLUR><DEF>>  

SFX N Y 10
SFX N 0 anád . <COND><PERS<2>><DEF>>  
SFX N 0 anám . <COND><PERS<1>><DEF>>  
SFX N 0 anák . <COND><PLUR><DEF>>  
SFX N 0 alak . <PERS<1<OBJ<2>>>>>  
SFX N 0 anánk . <COND><PERS<1>><PLUR><DEF>>  
SFX N 0 análak . <COND><PERS<1<OBJ<2>>>>>  
SFX N 0 anók . <COND><PERS<1>><PLUR><DEF>>formal  
SFX N 0 anátok . <COND><PERS<2>><PLUR><DEF>>  
SFX N 0 aná . <COND><DEF>>  
SFX N 0 ak ll <PERS<1<OBJ<2>>>>>  

SFX a Y 1
SFX a 0 tt [aáeéiíoóöõuúüû] <PAST>>  

SFX b Y 2
SFX b 0 nék . <COND><PERS<1>>>  
SFX b 0 sz [^sz] <PERS<2>>>  
